Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-209 Recovery of profits realized.
For the purpose of preventing the unfair use of information which may have been
obtained by the beneficial owner, director, or officer by reason of the
owner's, director's, or officer's relationship to the company, any profit
realized by the owner, director, or officer from any purchase and sale, or any
sale and purchase, of an equity security of the company within any period of
less than six months, unless the security was acquired in good faith in
connection with a debt previously contracted, shall inure to and be recoverable
by the company, irrespective of any intention on the part of the beneficial
owner, director or officer in entering into the transaction of holding the
security purchased or of not repurchasing the security sold for a period
exceeding six months. Suit to recover the profit may be instituted in any
court of competent jurisdiction by the company, or by the owner of any security
of the company in the name and in behalf of the company if the company fails or
refuses to bring the suit within sixty days after request or fails diligently
to prosecute the same thereafter; but no suit shall be brought more than two
years after the date such profit was realized. This section shall not be
construed to cover any transaction where the beneficial owner was not such both
at the time of the purchase and sale, or the sale and purchase, of the security
involved, or any transaction or transactions which the commissioner by rules
and regulations may exempt as not comprehended within the purpose of this
section. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next